lexc/se.lexc
LEXICON BípretWithSuffPron
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+1P+SG:baíthum		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+2P+SG:baíthut  		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+MASC:baíthi	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT:baíthi	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+FEM:boíthus	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+PL:boíthus		#;

!!\\\\\ SUFFIXES /////

LEXICON Emph
		#;
0:-		Emph2;

LEXICON Emph2
+EMPH+1P+SG:s^Vemph1SG			#;
+EMPH+2P+SG:s^Vemph2SG			#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+MASC:s^Vemph3Pm		#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+NEUT:s^Vemph3Pm		#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+FEM:si				#;
+EMPH+1P+PL:ni					#;
+EMPH+2P+PL:si					#;
+EMPH+3P+PL:s^Vemph3Pm			#;

LEXICON suffAbs3sg
						Emph3sg;
+PRON+1P+SG:um      	#;
+PRON+2P+SG:ut      	#;
+PRON+3P+SG+MASC:i		#;
+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT:i		#;
+PRON+3P+SG+FEM:us		#;
+PRON+1P+PL:unn			#;
+PRON+2P+PL:uib			#;
+PRON+3P+PL:us			#;

LEXICON Emph1sg
							#;
+EMPH+1P+SG:-s^Vemph1SG		#;

LEXICON Emph2sg
							#;	
+EMPH+2P+SG:-s^Vemph2SG		#;

LEXICON Emph3sg
								#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+MASC:-s^Vemph3Pm	#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+NEUT:-s^Vemph3Pm	#;
+EMPH+3P+SG+FEM:-si				#;
							
LEXICON Emph1pl
					#;
+EMPH+1P+PL:-ni		#;

LEXICON Emph2pl
					#;
+EMPH+2P+PL:-si		#;

LEXICON Emph3pl
							#;
+EMPH+3P+PL:-s^Vemph3Pm		#;
